Nebraska, session 109, LB926.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB926 LB926
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 43-512, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-512 (1) Any dependent child as defined in section 43-504 or any
relative or eligible caretaker of such a dependent child may file with
the Department of Health and Human Services a written application for
financial assistance for such child on forms furnished by the department.
(2) The department, through its agents and employees, shall make
such investigation pursuant to the application as it deems necessary or
as may be required by the county attorney or authorized attorney. If the
investigation or the application for financial assistance discloses that
such child has a parent or stepparent who is able to contribute to the
support of such child and has failed to do so, a copy of the finding of
such investigation and a copy of the application shall immediately be
filed with the county attorney or authorized attorney.
(3) The department shall make a finding as to whether the
application referred to in subsection (1) of this section should be
allowed or denied. If the department finds that the application should be
allowed, the department shall further find the amount of monthly
assistance which should be paid with reference to such dependent child.
Except as may be otherwise provided, payments shall be made by unit size
and shall be consistent with subdivisions (1)(p), (1)(q), (1)(t), (1)(u),
and (1)(v) of section 68-1713. Beginning on August 30, 2015, the maximum
payment level for monthly assistance shall be fifty-five percent of the
standard of need described in section 43-513.
No payments shall be made for amounts totaling less than ten dollars
per month except in the recovery of overpayments.
(4) The amount which shall be paid as assistance with respect to a
dependent child shall be based in each case upon the conditions disclosed
by the investigation made by the department. An appeal shall lie from the
finding made in each case to the chief executive officer of the
department or his or her designated representative. Such appeal may be
-2-

LB926 LB926
2026 2026
taken by any taxpayer or by any relative of such child. Proceedings for
and upon appeal shall be conducted in the same manner as provided for in
section 68-1016.
(5)(a) For the purpose of preventing dependency, the department
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations providing for services
to former and potential recipients of aid to dependent children and
medical assistance benefits. The department shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations establishing programs and cooperating with programs
of work incentive, work experience, job training, and education. The
provisions of this section with regard to determination of need, amount
of payment, maximum payment, and method of payment shall not be
applicable to families or children included in such programs. Income and
assets described in section 68-1201 shall not be included in
determination of need under this section.
(b) If a recipient of aid to dependent children becomes ineligible
for aid to dependent children as a result of increased hours of
employment or increased income from employment after having participated
in any of the programs established pursuant to subdivision (a) of this
subsection, the recipient may be eligible for the following benefits, as
provided in rules and regulations of the department in accordance with
sections 402, 417, and 1925 of the federal Social Security Act, as
amended, Public Law 100-485, in order to help the family during the
transition from public assistance to independence:
(i) An ongoing transitional payment that is intended to meet the
family's ongoing basic needs which may include food, clothing, shelter,
utilities, household goods, personal care items, and general incidental
expenses during the five months following the time the family becomes
ineligible for assistance under the aid to dependent children program, if
the family's earned income is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent
of the federal poverty level at the time the family becomes ineligible
for the aid to dependent children program. Payments shall be made in five
-3-

LB926 LB926
2026 2026
monthly payments, each equal to one-fifth of the aid to dependent
children payment standard for the family's size at the time the family
becomes ineligible for the aid to dependent children program. If during
the five-month period, (A) the family's earnings exceed one hundred
eighty-five percent of the federal poverty level, (B) the family members
are no longer working, (C) the family ceases to be Nebraska residents,
(D) there is no longer a minor child in the family's household, or (E)
the family again becomes eligible for the aid to dependent children
program, the family shall become ineligible for any remaining
transitional benefits under this subdivision; and
(ii) Child care as provided in subdivision (1)(c) of section
68-1724; and
(ii) (iii) Except as may be provided in accordance with subsection
(2) of section 68-1713 and subdivision (1)(c) of section 68-1724, medical
assistance for up to twelve months after the month the recipient becomes
employed and is no longer eligible for aid to dependent children.
(6) For purposes of sections 43-512 to 43-512.18:
(a) Authorized attorney shall mean an attorney, employed by the
county subject to the approval of the county board, employed by the
department, or appointed by the court, who is authorized to investigate
and prosecute child, spousal, and medical support cases. An authorized
attorney shall represent the state as provided in section 43-512.03;
(b) Child support shall be defined as provided in section 43-1705;
(c) Medical support shall include all expenses associated with the
birth of a child, cash medical support as defined in section 42-369,
health care coverage as defined in section 44-3,144, and medical and
hospital insurance coverage or membership in a health maintenance
organization or preferred provider organization;
(d) Spousal support shall be defined as provided in section 43-1715;
(e) State Disbursement Unit shall be defined as provided in section
43-3341; and
-4-

LB926 LB926
2026 2026
(f) Support shall be defined as provided in section 43-3313.
Sec. 2. Section 68-1724, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-1724 (1) Cash assistance shall be provided for a period or
periods of time not to exceed a total of thirty-six sixty months for
recipient families with children subject to the following:
(a) If the state fails to meet the specific terms of the self-
sufficiency contract developed under section 68-1719, the thirty-six-
month sixty-month time limit established in this section shall be
extended; and
(b) The thirty-six-month sixty-month time period for cash assistance
shall begin within the first month of eligibility. ;
(c) When no longer eligible to receive cash assistance, assistance
shall be available to reimburse work-related child care expenses even if
the recipient family has not achieved economic self-sufficiency. The
amount of such assistance shall be based on a cost-shared plan between
the recipient family and the state which shall provide assistance up to
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level prior to October 1,
2026, or one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty level on
and after October 1, 2026. A recipient family may be required to
contribute up to twenty percent of such family's gross income for child
care. It is the intent of the Legislature that transitional health care
coverage be made available on a sliding-scale basis to individuals and
families with incomes up to one hundred eighty-five percent of the
federal poverty level if other health care coverage is not available; and
(d) The self-sufficiency contract shall be revised and cash
assistance extended when there is no job available for adult members of
the recipient family. It is the intent of the Legislature that available
job shall mean a job which results in an income of at least equal to the
amount of cash assistance that would have been available if receiving
assistance minus unearned income available to the recipient family.
-5-

LB926 LB926
2026 2026
The department shall develop policy guidelines to allow for cash
assistance to persons who have received the maximum cash assistance
provided by this section and who face extreme hardship without additional
assistance. For purposes of this section, extreme hardship means a
recipient family does not have adequate cash resources to meet the costs
of the basic needs of food, clothing, and housing without continuing
assistance or the child or children are at risk of losing care by and
residence with their parent or parents.
(2) Cash assistance conditions under the Welfare Reform Act shall be
as follows:
(a) Adults in recipient families shall mean individuals at least
nineteen years of age living with and related to a child eighteen years
of age or younger and shall include parents , and siblings, uncles,
aunts, cousins, or grandparents, whether the relationship is biological,
adoptive, or step;
(b) The payment standard shall be based upon family size;
(c) The adults in the recipient family shall ensure that the minor
children regularly attend school. Education is a valuable personal
resource. The cash assistance provided to the recipient family may be
reduced when the parent or parents have failed to take reasonable action
to encourage the minor children of the recipient family ages sixteen and
under to regularly attend school. No reduction of assistance shall be
such as may result in extreme hardship. It is the intent of the
Legislature that a process be developed to insure communication between
the case manager, the parent or parents, and the school to address issues
relating to school attendance;
(d) Two-parent families which would otherwise be eligible under
section 43-504 or a federally approved waiver shall receive cash
assistance under this section;
(e) For minor parents, the assistance payment shall be based on the
minor parent's income. If the minor parent lives with at least one
-6-

LB926 LB926
2026 2026
parent, the family's income shall be considered in determining
eligibility and cash assistance payment levels for the minor parent. If
the minor parent lives independently, support shall be pursued from the
parents of the minor parent. If the absent parent of the minor's child is
a minor, support from his or her parents shall be pursued. Support from
parents as allowed under this subdivision shall not be pursued when the
family income is less than two three hundred percent of the federal
poverty guidelines; and
(f) For adults who are not biological or adoptive parents or
stepparents of the child or children in the family, if assistance is
requested for the entire family, including the adults, a self-sufficiency
contract shall be entered into as provided in section 68-1719. If
assistance is requested for only the child or children in such a family,
such children shall be eligible after consideration of the family's
income and if (i) the family cooperates in pursuing child support and
(ii) the minor children of the family regularly attend school.
Sec. 3. Original sections 43-512 and 68-1724, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-7-